Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 6 to 9 of this  2019 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Average income” means an income that complies with  income restrictions deter-
mined at the advice and consent of the Oregon Housing  Stability Council, but not to exceed
the greater of 100 percent of the  statewide or local area median income adjusted for house-
hold size as determined annually by the Housing and Community  Services Department using
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development information.
(b) “Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation that is  exempt from income taxes under
section 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code as  amended and in effect on December
31, 2016.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department shall provide one or  more loans
to nonprofit corporations to create manufactured dwelling park  preservation programs that
invest in, and provide loans for, the preservation and  affordability of manufactured dwelling
parks in this state.
(3) To be eligible for  a loan under this section, a nonprofit corporation shall demonstrate
to the satisfaction of the department that the nonprofit corporation:
(a) Is a community development financial institution operating statewide  to support in-
vestment in, and acquisition, renovation and construction of, affordable housing;
(b) Has the ability and capacity to provide the services and  reporting required of the
program described in subsections (4) and (6) of this section; and
(c) Meets other requirements established by the department regarding financial  risk and
availability or accessibility of additional resources.
(4) An eligible nonprofit  corporation, with input from the department, shall develop a
manufactured dwelling park preservation program that:
(a) Invests in, and loans funds to, other nonprofit corporations,  housing authorities,
manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperatives as defined in ORS  62.803, local units of
government as defined  in ORS 466.706, agencies as defined in ORS 183.310, or any entity in
which a nonprofit corporation has a controlling  share, to purchase or refinance manufac-
tured dwelling parks that will maintain the parks as parks long term;
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 1
(b) Emphasizes, when providing loans under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the fi-
nancing of parks whose residents are predominantly members of households with income less
than average income; and
(c) Preserves the affordability of the park space rent to park tenants  who are members
of households with income less than average income.
(5) An eligible nonprofit corporation shall create a park preservation account  to be used
by the nonprofit corporation for  the manufactured dwelling park preservation program and
shall deposit the moneys loaned by the department into the account.
(6) An eligible nonprofit corporation shall ensure that all  financial activities of the pro-
gram are paid from  and into the park preservation account created under subsection (5) of
this section. Each nonprofit corporation shall report to the department no less  than semi-
annually, showing the expenses and incomes of the park preservation account and the results
of the manufactured dwelling park preservation program.
(7) A loan made by the department under this section:
(a) May require the nonprofit corporation to pay interest.
(b) May not require the nonprofit  corporation to make any loan payments before the
maturity date of the loan.
(c) Must have a maturity date of no later than September 15, 2036.
(d) May have its maturity date extended by the department.
(e) Shall have all or part of the unpaid  balance forgiven by the department in an amount
not to exceed the losses incurred on investments or loans made by the nonprofit corporation
under subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(f) May include such agreements by the nonprofit corporation practical to secure the loan
made by the department and to accomplish the  purposes of the program described in sub-
section (4) of this section.
(8) The department or the State Treasurer shall deposit moneys received in servicing  the
loan into the General Housing Account of  the Oregon Housing Fund created under ORS
458.620.
SECTION 3.
No later than September 15, 2021, and no later than September 15 of  each
odd-numbered year thereafter,  the Housing and Community Services Department shall re-
port, in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, to  the appropriate interim committee or com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly on the implementation of the  manufactured dwelling
park preservation program created pursuant to section 2 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 3 of this 2019 Act is repealed on January 2, 2038.
SECTION 5.  ORS 90.849 is amended to read:
90.849. (1) In addition to providing notice as  required by ORS 90.842, upon sale of a manufac-
tured dwelling park under ORS 90.842 to 90.850 or  upon any sale, transfer, exchange or other
conveyance of a manufactured dwelling park described in  ORS 90.848, the owner shall give notice
of the conveyance to the Office of Manufactured Dwelling Park Community Relations stating:
[(1)] (a)  The number of vacant spaces and homes in the manufactured dwelling park;
[(2)] (b) If applicable, the final sale price of the manufactured dwelling park;
[(3)] (c)  The date the conveyance became final; and
[(4)] (d) The name, address and telephone number of the new owner.
(2) Upon receipt of a notice under  ORS 90.655 (1) or 90.842 (3) or subsection (1) of this
section, the office shall make available on a website any public information contained in  the
notice and shall  deliver the information to any person who has requested copies in a manner
prescribed by the office.
SECTION 6. (1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall establish a pro-
gram to provide loans to individuals to buy and site manufactured  dwellings that replace
older and less energy efficient manufactured dwellings.
(2) The department may  make loans under the program only to individual borrowers who:
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 2
(a) Are members of households with income that complies with  income restrictions de-
termined at the advice and consent of the Oregon Housing Stability Council,  but not to ex-
ceed the greater of 100 percent of the statewide or local area median income  adjusted for
household size as determined annually by the Housing and  Community Services Department
using United States Department of Housing and Urban Development information; and
(b) Will purchase a manufactured dwelling that:
(A) Meets energy efficiency standards as prescribed by the  Housing and Community
Services Department;
(B)(i) Will be sited in a manufactured dwelling  park that has registered with the Office
of Manufactured Dwelling Park Community Relations and either  has entered into a regula-
tory agreement with the department  or is negotiating a regulatory agreement that is at least
partially conditioned upon the replacement of the dwelling; or
(ii) Will be sited on  land owned or purchased under a land sale contract by the individual
borrower; and
(C) Will be the primary residence of the borrower throughout the term of the loan.
(3) A  loan under this section may not exceed $35,000 per individual. The department shall
prescribe by rule lending requirements and terms for  loans made under this program, in-
cluding:
(a) Interest rates charged to borrowers, if any;
(b) Repayment requirements, if any;
(c) Loan forgiveness opportunities, if any;
(d) Affordability requirements; and
(e) Remedies upon transfer or default.
(4) In servicing loans under the program, the  department shall deposit all moneys re-
ceived into the Manufactured Home  Preservation Fund established in section 9 of this 2019
Act.
(5) The council may establish priorities for evaluating loan applications and shall  give
consideration to prioritizing loans to borrowers who are:
(a) From low income households; and
(b) Decommissioning and replacing manufactured dwellings  that are older or less re-
source or energy efficient.
SECTION 7.
(1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall establish a pro-
gram to provide grants to persons for safely decommissioning and disposing of a manufac-
tured dwelling as defined in ORS 446.003.
(2) The department may award grants under the program only to a person that is:
(a)(A) An individual who owns a manufactured dwelling sited:
(i) In a  manufactured dwelling park that has registered with the Office of Manufactured
Dwelling Park Community Relations and either has entered into a regulatory agreement with
the department or is negotiating a  regulatory agreement that is at least partially conditioned
upon the replacement of the dwelling;
(ii) On land owned by the individual; or
(iii) On land being purchased by the individual under a land sale contract as defined  in
ORS 18.960; or
(B) An entity described  in paragraph (b)(B) of this subsection that has a controlling in-
terest, including a controlling interest in a general partner of a limited partnership, in:
(i) The manufactured dwelling; or
(ii) A manufactured dwelling  park where the manufactured dwelling slated for disposal
is sited; and
(b)(A) An individual  who is a member of a household with income that complies with in-
come restrictions determined at the advice  and consent of the Oregon Housing Stability
Council, and not exceeding the greater of 100 percent of the statewide or local area  median
income adjusted for household  size as determined annually by the Housing and Community
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 3
Services Department using United States Department of Housing and Urban  Development
information; or
(B) A nonprofit  corporation as defined in ORS 317.097, a manufactured dwelling park
nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS 62.803, a housing authority as defined in ORS 456.005,
a local unit of government as defined in ORS 466.706 or a state governmental entity.
(3) Grants awarded under the program may not  exceed 80 percent of the cost of decom-
missioning and disposing of the manufactured dwelling.
(4) The Oregon Housing Stability Council may establish priorities for the  evaluation of
grant applications and shall consider prioritizing grant awards:
(a) For the  safe remediation of dwellings with environmental and public health hazards
and risks, including asbestos, lead paint and mold;
(b) To owners from low income households; and
(c) For the decommissioning  of manufactured dwellings that are older or less resource
and energy efficient.
SECTION 8.
(1) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department  shall
appoint an advisory committee on manufactured housing. The director has the discretion to
determine the membership of the committee and the terms of  committee members, but shall
consider for membership representatives from the following groups:
(a) State  agencies such as the Housing and Community Services Department, the De-
partment of Land Conservation and Development, the Department  of Environmental Quality,
the Department of Consumer and Business Services  and the Oregon Business Development
Department;
(b) The United States  Department of Housing and Urban Development and the United
States Department of Agriculture Rural Development;
(c) Local governments and local government agencies;
(d) Owners of  manufactured dwelling parks that have an interest in providing affordable
housing, or nonprofit  corporations or cooperative corporations that own manufactured
dwelling parks;
(e) Representatives of  organizations that have a particular focus on serving people of
color and  that provide financial counseling, education or the opportunity to purchase af-
fordable housing to individuals and families;
(f) Lenders or other persons that offer financing for manufactured dwelling parks or for
purchasing manufactured dwellings; and
(g) Manufactured dwelling park tenants or owners of manufactured dwellings.
(2) The advisory committee shall:
(a) Advise the Housing and Community Services Department and  other state agencies
with respect to matters  of interest and concern that are related to manufactured housing,
manufactured dwellings and manufactured dwelling parks;
(b) Develop and promote strategies to maximize long-term  preservation of manufactured
dwelling parks as affordable housing;
(c) Identify and propose solutions  to overcome barriers that prevent development of
manufactured dwelling parks;
(d) Identify strategies to fund, preserve and improve infrastructure  in manufactured
dwelling parks;
(e) Develop and propose fair and equitable sources  of financing for purchasing manufac-
tured dwellings;
(f) Identify and promote strategies and services for assisting owners of  manufactured
dwellings to weatherize  existing manufactured dwellings or replace deteriorating manufac-
tured dwellings;
(g) Develop, approve or promote courses to counsel  home buyers with respect to pur-
chasing manufactured dwellings in this state;
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 4
(h) Identify and propose solutions to overcome barriers that prevent using manufactured
dwellings as accessory dwelling units;
(i) Encourage  the development of capacity for nonprofit corporations and residents of
this state to acquire, own and  maintain manufactured dwelling parks in fair market trans-
actions;
(j) Conduct annual evaluations  of the committee’s efforts and the efforts of the Housing
and Community Services Department and other state agencies in  achieving the actions, pri-
orities, goals and functions described in this subsection;
(k) Encourage and promote home buyer and homeowner counseling and education; and
(L) Meaningfully engage culturally specific and  culturally responsive organizations and
their constituents, including federally recognized Indian tribes located within this state.
(3) In undertaking the duties  described in subsection (2) of this section, the advisory
committee shall take account  of the capacity of the department’s staff and resources and the
staff and resources of other state agencies.
(4) The advisory committee shall compile and report the results of  the committee’s
evaluations under subsection (2)(j) of this section to the Oregon Housing  Stability Council
not later than March 30 of each year.
SECTION 9.
(1) The Manufactured Home Preservation Fund is established within the
State Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest  earned by the Manu-
factured Home Preservation Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Manufactured Home Preservation Fund consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts  appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly;
(c) Amounts received from state or federal sources to be deposited into the fund;
(d) Income derived from moneys in the fund; and
(e) Other amounts deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department to:
(a) Carry out the provisions of sections 6 to 8 of this 2019 Act; and
(b) Pay the administrative costs associated with the  fund and with implementing and
maintaining the programs and advisory committee established under  sections 6 to 8 of this
2019 Act.
SECTION 10.
(1) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall provide one or
more grants to a nonprofit organization for  the purposes of developing or improving
infrastructure for a manufactured dwelling park.
(2) A nonprofit organization eligible for grants under this section must:
(a) Have experience in manufactured dwelling park development and redevelopment; and
(b) Own or have made plans  to purchase or develop a manufactured dwelling park in
Springfield, Oregon.
(3) A nonprofit organization receiving grants under  this section shall enter into an
agreement with the  department and a local housing authority that requires the nonprofit to:
(a) Ensure that  the manufactured dwelling park primarily supports residents who are low
income or who have been displaced by the recent closure of an existing park;
(b) Provide a report to the department on or before November 15, 2020, that includes:
(A) The nonprofit organization’s accounting and use of grant moneys under  this section;
(B) Identification of other moneys or other assistance that the  nonprofit organization
was able to obtain or plans to obtain to support  the acquisition and development of the park
or to acquire manufactured dwellings  made available for rent or purchase by the nonprofit
organization in the park;
(C) Identification of other moneys or other assistance that the nonprofit organization
obtained, or assisted the residents of the park in obtaining, that  provided direct support to
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 5
the park’s low income  and displaced residents, including outreach and counseling, and ac-
quisition, rehabilitation, transportation or demolition of manufactured dwellings;
(D) Outreach, counseling and other resources that the  nonprofit has provided or plans
to provide to the park’s low income and displaced residents; and
(E) Lessons learned and any best practices  identified by the nonprofit regarding subpar-
agraphs (A) to (D) of this paragraph; and
(c) Meet any other requirements that the department may establish.
SECTION 11.
In addition to the funds appropriated by section 18 (3) of this 2019 Act,
notwithstanding ORS 456.579 (1) and 456.581, the  Housing and Community Services Depart-
ment may use moneys  available in the Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account established
under ORS 458.579 to fund grants under section 10 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 12. No later than December 15, 2020, the Housing and Community Services
Department shall provide a report to  the Legislative Assembly or an appropriate committee
of the Legislative Assembly in the manner  provided under ORS 192.245 on the use of grant
moneys under section 10 of  this 2019 Act, including the information reported by the nonprofit
organization that received grant moneys under section 10 (3)(b) of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 13. Sections 10, 11 and 12 of this 2019 Act are repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 14. (1) The amendments to ORS 456.579 by section 15 of this  2019 Act are in-
tended to change the name  of the “Mobile Home Parks Purchase Account” to the “Manu-
factured Dwelling Parks Account.”
(2) Whenever, in any statutory law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly or in  any
rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by the Legislative Assembly,  reference is
made to the Mobile Home Parks Purchase Account, the reference is considered  to be a ref-
erence to the Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account.
(3) For the purpose of harmonizing  and clarifying statutory law, the Legislative Counsel
may substitute  for words designating the “Mobile Home Parks Purchase Account,” wherever
they occur in statutory law, other words designating the “Manufactured Dwelling Parks
Account.”
SECTION 15.
 ORS 456.579 is amended to read:
456.579. (1) There is established  separate and distinct from the General Fund an account to be
known as the [ Mobile Home  Parks Purchase ] Manufactured Dwelling Parks  Account. [ Except as
otherwise provided by  law, all moneys credited to the Mobile Home Parks Purchase ] Moneys in the
account are continuously appropriated [ continuously] to the [ Director of the ] Housing and Commu-
nity Services Department for the purpose of carrying out  the duties and responsibilities imposed
upon the [ Housing and Community  Services ] department under ORS 90.800 to 90.850 and 456.581 and
this section. Interest earned on [ moneys in ] the account [ must be] is  credited to the account.
(2) Except for loans provided in ORS 90.840, moneys in the  account described in subsection (1)
of this  section may not be connected to or commingled in any way with the moneys in the fund
described in ORS 456.720.
(3) For the purpose  of carrying out the provisions of ORS 90.800 to 90.850 and 456.581 and this
section, the [ Housing and Community Services ] department may seek  moneys from any lawful source.
Moneys obtained by the department  pursuant to this subsection must be credited to the [ Mobile
Home Parks Purchase ] account.
SECTION 16.  ORS 456.581 is amended to read:
456.581. The  [Mobile Home Parks Purchase ] Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account established
in ORS 456.579 shall be used by the Housing and Community Services Department to provide:
(1) Technical  assistance to tenants’ associations, manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooper-
atives, tenants’ association  supported nonprofit organizations and housing authorities and to help
tenants in activities related to the purchase or preservation  of a mobile home park or a manufac-
tured dwelling park by  a tenants’ association, a manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative,
a tenants’ association supported nonprofit  organization, a housing authority or a corporate entity
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 6
legally  capable  of purchasing real property that is formed by or associated with tenants pursuant
to ORS 90.844.
(2) By  rule, loans for initial costs for purchasing a mobile home park or manufactured dwelling
park or the development of infrastructure for a newly purchased park  that the department
determines has a significant percentage of tenants who are individuals of lower income  or who have
been displaced by the recent closure of an existing park . Loans provided under this section may
be made only if the department is of the opinion that the purchase is economically feasible and  only
to:
(a) A tenants’  association, a manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative, a tenants’ asso-
ciation supported nonprofit organization or a housing authority; or
(b) A corporate entity legally capable of purchasing real property  that is formed by or associ-
ated with tenants pursuant to ORS 90.844 and that includes  more than 50 percent of the tenants
residing in the park.
SECTION 17.  ORS 90.840 is amended to read:
90.840. (1) The Director of the Housing and Community Services  Department may lend funds
available  to  the Housing and Community Services Department to provide funds necessary to carry
out the provisions of ORS 456.581 (2). Such funds advanced shall  be repaid to the Housing and
Community Services Department as determined by the director.
(2) Notwithstanding any budget limitation, the  director may spend funds available from the
[Mobile Home Parks Purchase ] Manufactured Dwelling Parks  Account to employ personnel  to
carry out the provisions of ORS 456.581 (1).
SECTION 18. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund:
(1) The amount of $9,500,000 for administering and funding loans under section 2  of this
2019 Act and for carrying out the requirements  of the Office of Manufactured Dwelling Park
Community Relations under ORS 90.849 (2).
(2) The amount of $2,500,000 for deposit into the  Manufactured Home Preservation Fund
established in section 9 of this 2019 Act.
(3) The amount of $3,000,000 for deposit  into the Manufactured Dwelling Parks Account
established under ORS 456.579 to fund grants under section 10 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2019 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5512), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
for operations, from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and
federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for
contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  this section,
collected or received by the Housing and Community Services  Department, is increased by
$5,500,000 for expenditures related to sections 6, 7, 8 and 10 of this 2019 Act.
SECTION 20. This 2019 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2019
regular session of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 7
Passed by House June 25, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2896 (HB 2896-B) Page 8